Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB707.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 403.211 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An action to establish or enforce child support may be initiated by the parent,
custodian, or agency substantially contributing to the support of the child. The
action may be brought in the county in which the child resides or where the
defendant resides.
(2) Notwithstanding the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure or any other provision of
law, a child shall not:
(a) Initiate, intervene in, or otherwise become a party to an action under this
section or in any related dissolution of marriage proceeding; or
(b) Receive child support payments directly, unless the child is emancipated due
to age and still eligible for support in accordance with subsection (3) of
Section 2 of this Act.
(3) At the time of initial establishment of a child support order, whether temporary or
permanent, or in any proceeding to modify a support order, the child support
guidelines in KRS 403.212 or 403.2122 shall serve as a rebuttable presumption for
the establishment or modification of the amount of child support. Courts may
deviate from the guidelines where their application would be unjust or
inappropriate. Any deviation shall be accompanied by a written finding or specific
finding on the record by the court[,] specifying the reason for the deviation.
(4)[(3)] A written finding or specific finding on the record that the application of the
guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case shall be sufficient to
rebut the presumption and allow for an appropriate adjustment of the guideline
award if based upon one (1) or more of the following criteria:
(a) A child's extraordinary medical or dental needs;
(b) A child's extraordinary educational, job training, or special needs;
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2246
(c) Either parent's own extraordinary needs, such as medical expenses;
(d) The independent financial resources, if any, of the child or children;
(e) Combined monthly adjusted parental gross income in excess of the Kentucky
child support guidelines;
(f) The parents of the child, having demonstrated knowledge of the amount of
child support established by the Kentucky child support guidelines, have
agreed to child support different from the guideline amount. However,[ no
such] an agreement shall not be the basis of any deviation if public assistance
is being paid on behalf of a child under the provisions of Part D of Title IV of
the Federal Social Security Act;
(g) Failure by one (1) party to consistently exercise the court-ordered timesharing
schedule or timesharing agreement between the parents; and
(h) Any similar factor of an extraordinary nature specifically identified by the
court which would make application of the guidelines inappropriate.
(5)[(4)] "Extraordinary" as used in this section shall be determined by the court in its
discretion.
(6)[(5)] When a party has defaulted or the court is otherwise presented with
insufficient evidence to determine gross income, the court shall order child support
based upon the needs of the child or the previous standard of living of the child,
whichever is greater. An order entered by default or due to insufficient evidence to
determine gross income may be modified upward and arrearages awarded from the
date of the original order if evidence of gross income is presented within two (2)
years, which would have established a higher amount of child support pursuant to
the child support guidelines set forth in KRS 403.212 or 403.2122.
(7)[(6)] The court shall allocate between the parents, in proportion to their combined
monthly adjusted parental gross income, reasonable and necessary child care costs
incurred due to employment, job search, or education leading to employment, in
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2246
addition to the amount ordered under the child support guidelines.
(8)[(7)] (a) Pursuant to 45 C.F.R. sec. 303.31(a)(2),[ for the purposes of] as used in
this section, "health care coverage" includes fee for service, health
maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, and other types of
private health insurance and public health care coverage under which medical
services could be provided to a dependent child. If health care coverage is
reasonable in cost and accessible to either parent at the time the request for
coverage is made, the court shall:
1. Order the parent to obtain or maintain coverage;[,] and[ the court shall]
2. Allocate between the parents, in proportion to their combined monthly
adjusted parental gross income, the cost of health care coverage for the
child, in addition to the support ordered under the child support
guidelines.
(b) A parent[,] who has one hundred percent (100%) of the combined monthly
adjusted parental gross income[,] shall be entitled to a reduction in gross
income of the entire amount of premiums incurred and paid.
(c) The court shall order the cost of health care coverage of the child to be paid
by either or both parents of the child regardless of who has physical custody.
The court order shall include:
1. A judicial directive designating which parent shall have financial
responsibility for providing health care coverage for the dependent
child, which shall include but not be limited to health care coverage[,] or
payments of necessary health care deductibles or copayments;
2. If appropriate, cash medical support. "Cash medical support" means an
amount to be paid toward the cost of health care coverage, fixed
payments for ongoing medical costs, extraordinary medical expenses, or
any combination thereof; and
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2246
3. A statement providing that if the designated parent's health care
coverage provides for covered services for dependent children beyond
the age of majority, then any unmarried children up to twenty-five (25)
years of age who are full-time students enrolled in and attending an
accredited educational institution and who are primarily dependent on
the insured parent for maintenance and support shall be covered.
(d) If health care coverage is not reasonable in cost and accessible at the time the
request for the coverage is made, the court order shall provide for cash
medical support until health care coverage becomes reasonable in cost and
accessible.
(9)[(8)] (a) As used in[For purposes of] this section, "reasonable in cost" means that
the cost of coverage to the responsible parent does not exceed five percent
(5%) of his or her gross income. The five percent (5%) standard shall apply to
the cost of adding the child to an existing policy, the difference in the cost
between a single and a family policy, or the cost of acquiring a separate policy
to cover the child. If the parties agree or the court finds good cause exists, the
court may order health care coverage in excess of five percent (5%) of the
parent's gross income.
(b) As used in[For purposes of] this section, "accessible" means that there are
providers who meet the health care needs of the child and who are located no
more than sixty (60) minutes or sixty (60) miles from the child's primary
residence, except that this section[nothing] shall not prohibit use of a provider
located more than sixty (60) minutes or sixty (60) miles from the child's
primary residence.
(10)[(9)] The initial two hundred fifty dollars ($250) of medical expenses shall be
covered by the parent who maintains health insurance for the child or children
subject to the order per calendar year, unless the parties have agreed otherwise.
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2246
(11)[(10)] (a) The cost of extraordinary medical expenses shall be allocated between
the parties in proportion to their combined monthly adjusted parental gross
incomes.
(b) 1. "Extraordinary medical expenses" means uninsured expenses in excess
of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the child or children subject to
the order per calendar year.
2. "Extraordinary medical expenses" includes but is not limited to the costs
that are reasonably necessary for:
a. Medical, surgical, dental, orthodontal, optometric, nursing, and
hospital services;[ for]
b. Professional counseling or psychiatric therapy for diagnosed
medical disorders; and[ for]
c. Drugs and medical supplies, appliances, laboratory, diagnostic,
and therapeutic services.
(12)[(11)] The court order shall include the Social Security numbers, provided in
accordance with KRS 403.135, of all parties subject to a support order.
(13)[(12)] In any case administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, if the
parent ordered to provide health care coverage is enrolled through an insurer but
fails to enroll the child under family coverage, the other parent or the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services may, upon application, enroll the child.
(14)[(13)] In any case administered by the cabinet, information received or transmitted
shall not be published or be open for public inspection, including reasonable
evidence of domestic violence or child abuse if the disclosure of the information
could be harmful to the custodial parent or the child of the parent. Necessary
information and records may be furnished as specified by KRS 205.175.
(15)[(14)] In the case in which a parent is obligated to provide health care coverage, and
changes employment, and the new employer provides health care coverage, the
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2246
Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall transfer notice of the provision for
coverage for the child to the employer, which shall operate to enroll this child in the
obligated parent's health plan, unless the obligated parent contests the notice as
specified by KRS Chapter 13B.
(16)[(15)] Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any wage or income shall
not be exempt from attachment or assignment for the payment of current,[ child
support or] owed, or to-be-owed child support.
(17)[(16)] A payment of money received by a child as a result of a parental disability
shall be credited against the child support obligation of the parent. A payment shall
not be counted as income to either parent when calculating a child support
obligation. An amount received in excess of the child support obligation shall be
credited against a child support arrearage owed by the parent that accrued
subsequent to the date of the parental disability, but shall not be applied to an
arrearage that accrued prior to the date of disability. The date of disability shall be
as determined by the paying agency.
(18) Child support payments shall be directed to the parent, custodian, or agency
substantially contributing to the support of the child.
Section 2. KRS 403.213 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky child support guidelines may be used by the parent, custodian, or
agency substantially contributing to the support of the child as the basis for periodic
updates of child support obligations and for modification of child support orders for
health care. The provisions of any decree respecting child support may be modified
only as to installments accruing subsequent to the filing of the motion for
modification and only upon a showing of a material change in circumstances that is
substantial and continuing.
(2) Application of the Kentucky child support guidelines to the circumstances of the
parties at the time of the filing of a motion or petition for modification of the child
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2246
support order which results in equal to or greater than a fifteen percent (15%)
change in the amount of support due per month shall be rebuttably presumed to be a
material change in circumstances. Application which results in less than a fifteen
percent (15%) change in the amount of support due per month shall be rebuttably
presumed not to be a material change in circumstances. For the one (1) year period
immediately following enactment of this statute, the presumption of material
change shall be a twenty-five percent (25%) change in the amount of child support
due rather than[ the] fifteen percent (15%)[ stated above].
(3) (a) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree,
provisions for the support of a child shall be terminated by emancipation of
the child unless the child is a high school student when he or she reaches the
age of eighteen (18). In cases where the child becomes emancipated because
of age, but not due to marriage, while still a high school student, the court-
ordered support shall continue while the child is a high school student, but not
beyond completion of the school year during which the child reaches the age
of nineteen (19) years.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or court interpretation, a child
support order shall not be entered, continued, or made retroactive for any
period after the child has reached the age of eighteen (18), unless the child
was under the age of eighteen (18) at the time the action to establish or
enforce child support was initiated.
(c) Provisions for the support of the child shall not be terminated by the death of
a parent obligated to support the child. If a parent obligated to pay support
dies, the amount of support may be modified, revoked, or commuted to a
lump-sum payment, to the extent just and appropriate in the circumstances.
Emancipation of the child shall not terminate the obligation of child support
arrearages that accrued while the child was an unemancipated minor.
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2246
(4) The child support guidelines table shall be reviewed at least once every four (4)
years by a commission consisting of the following persons:
(a) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or a supervisory
staff person designated by him or her;
(b) Two (2) members of the Kentucky Bar Association who have at least six (6)
consecutive years' experience and are presently practicing domestic relations
cases, one (1) member from a metropolitan or large urban area and one (1)
member from a less populated area;
(c) Two (2) Circuit Judges appointed by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky
Supreme Court, one (1) from a metropolitan or large urban area, and one (1)
from a less populated area;
(d) One (1) District Judge appointed by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky
Supreme Court;
(e) Two (2) county attorneys appointed by the president of the County Attorneys
Association, one (1) from a metropolitan or large urban area and one (1) from
a less populated area;
(f) The Attorney General or his or her designee, who shall be an attorney from
his or her office;
(g) One (1) person who is a custodial parent;
(h) One (1) person who is a noncustodial parent;
(i) One (1) person who is a parent with split custody; and
(j) One (1) child advocate.
The members designated in paragraphs (g) to (j) of this subsection shall be
appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names for each category
submitted by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. If the status of one (1) of
these members changes, the member shall be replaced through appointment by the
Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the cabinet.
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2246
(5) The commission shall make a recommendation to the Kentucky General Assembly
to ensure that the child support guidelines table results in a determination of
appropriate child support amounts.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:39 AM Jacketed